Hawaii, session 2026, GM1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that although the State
did not reach mandates established in 1991 under section 342G-3,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, to reduce the solid waste stream by
fifty per cent by 2000, the aioha+ challenge established a goal
to reduce the solid waste stream prior to disposal by seventy
per cent by 2030 through source reduction, recycling,
bioconversion, and landfill diversion methods for organic waste.
The legislature further finds that county integrated solid
waste management plans must be submitted to the department of
health every ten years pursuant to section 342G-24, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to meet United
Nations Sustainable Development and aloha+ challenge goals
related to waste reduction by embedding similar goals into the
integrated solid waste management plan components for the
counties to assess and identify benchmarks to reduce solid waste
production and increase organic waste diversion, while
2026-2384 SB2101 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 2 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
accounting for existing county integrated solid waste management
plan timelines.
SECTION 2. Section 342G-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
"(a) It is the goal of the State to reduce the solid waste
stream [pr-Aer•••feo] before disposal by:
(1) [Twenty-five] Forty per cent by January 1, [ 19-9-5; ]
2038; and
(2) Seventy per cent by January 1, 2043,
through source reduction, recycling, organic waste landfill
diversion, and bioconversion. Where feasible, the office shall
establish other state goals for specific commodities,
recognizing market considerations.
(b) It is the goal of the State to reduce [by not -l-eso
than twenty-five per cent the amount- of office paper.gone-ratod
fey—aii—efeate—aftd—eeuft-&y—ageneies—by—Januafy—It—1995,—through
Goa-g-ee- reduction.--The base- year —for-eal-eulating progreoo toward
thi-e-goal shall be total office paper conoumption by otate and
county agencies in 1990.] organic waste stream disposal via
incineration, waste-to-energy, or landfill by:
(1) Forty per cent by January 1, 2038;
2026-2384 SB2101 GDI SMA-l.docx 2
IIHIIilMIIIIIIHIIIIWM

Page 3
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(2) Seventy Eer cent by January 12 2p43£ar^
(3) One hundred per cent by January 1, 2048.”
SECTION 3. Section 342G-26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
"(c) The recycling bioconversion, and organic waste
diversion component shall identify and assess:
(1) The level of waste reduction the county is achieving
through existing recycling and bioconversion efforts;
(2) The type and amount of solid waste that it is
technically and economically feasible to recycle or
alter through bioconversion; [aed]
(3) Methods to increase and improve [tfee] recycling and
bioconversion efforts, including opportunities for
backyard composting[—]; and
(4) Methods to achieve organic waste stream reduction
goals pursuant to section 342G-3(b); provided that the
methods shall account for reducing potential risk of
transporting invasive species in organic waste.
For the purposes of this paragraph, "organic waste"
means any material that is compostable, does not
contain contaminants detrimental to human health and
2026-2384 SB2101 GDI SMA-l.docx 3
liiHiiiiimiimiiiiiii

Page 4
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the environment, and is derived from either a plant or
an animal, and includes green waste, food waste,
food-soiled paper that is acceptable for food storage,
and untreated and unpainted wood waste.
For recycling, the counties shall assess the type and
amount of solid waste that it is technically feasible to
recycle, giving consideration at a minimum to clear glass,
colored glass, aluminum, steel and bimetallic cans, high-grade
office paper, newsprint, mixed paper, corrugated paper, HOPE,
PET, and green waste.
For bioconversion, the counties shall assess the type and
amount of solid waste that it is technically feasible to alter
through bioconversion, giving consideration at a minimum to
green waste, wood waste, animal manure, sewage sludge, and food
wastes."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2384 SB2101 CDl SMA-l.docx
IWMIBIIIIIIIiniMMHIIII

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2101, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai ‘ i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
182-26

SB No. 2101, SD 1,HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives